Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. Generally
§ 41-3-104.
Procedure to change use or place of use.

When an owner of a water right wishes to change a water right from its present use to another use, or from the place of use under the existing right to a new place of use, he shall file a petition requesting permission to make such a change. The petition shall set forth all pertinent facts about the existing use and the proposed change in use, or, where a change in place of use is requested, all pertinent information about the existing place of use and the proposed place of use. The board may require that an advertised public hearing or hearings be held at the petitioner’s expense. The petitioner shall provide a transcript of the public hearing to the board. The change in use, or change in place of use, may be allowed, provided that the quantity of water transferred by the granting of the petition shall not exceed the amount of water historically diverted under the existing use, nor exceed the historic rate of diversion under the existing use, nor increase the historic amount consumptively used under the existing use, nor decrease the historic amount of return flow, nor in any manner injure other existing lawful appropriators. The board of control shall consider all facts it believes pertinent to the transfer which may include the following:

The economic loss to the community and the state if the use from which the right is transferred is discontinued;

The extent to which such economic loss will be offset by the new use;

Whether other sources of water are available for the new use.

In all cases where the matter of compensation is in dispute, the question of compensation shall be submitted to the proper district court for determination.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-4.1; Laws 1974, ch. 23, § 1.

Legislative purpose of section

is to provide a procedure for those wishing to change a water right and to place limitations on the amount of water which can be transferred. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Permitted changes. —

This section permits all changes of water rights to new uses or places of use that do not injure other appropriators or increase the historic use of water in quantity, rate of diversion or amount of consumption. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Wyoming State Board of Control did not err in granting applicants'
petition to change the place of use, point of diversion, and means of conveyance for water appropriations because the Board's decision was consistent with the law; as reduced, the transferred water right would not exceed the amount of water historically diverted under the existing use, nor exceed the historic rate of diversion under the existing use.
Garber v. Wagonhound Land & Livestock Co., 2012 WY 89, 279 P.3d 525,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2012).

Transfer not to injure other appropriators. —

In a situation where the grantor of an irrigation water right sells to a grantee who intends to make the same use of the right, in circumstances where evidence of surplus and waste is not present and therefore there is no issue of beneficial and/or consumptive use, and in circumstances where there are no statutory inhibitions against the sale, the only limitation upon such a transfer of a water right from the land to which it was first applied is that it shall not injuriously affect the rights of other appropriators. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Beneficial use limitation. —

While one of the fundamental principles applicable to any transfer of water rights for change in use is the avoidance of injury, equally fundamental is the principle which holds that an appropriator obtains a transferable water right only to the extent that he has put his appropriation to a beneficial use. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Only water which has been beneficially applied is subject to sale and transfer. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Meaning of “consumptive use” limitation. —

For the purposes of transferring an irrigation water right, the concept of consumptive use has been consistently limited to the amount of water, less other contributing sources of water, which will result in the successful growing of a crop and, in a proper case, consideration should also be given to the amount of water lost by evaporation and seepage while the water is in transit from the headgate to the place of use. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Concepts of “beneficial use” and “consumptive use” compared. —

See Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

“Duty of water” discussed. —

See Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Senior appropriator, not lower landowner, has right to waste and seepage. —

A senior appropriator has the right to recapture waste and seepage water. The lower landowner using such water merely takes his chances as to future supplies, no matter how long he uses such water. Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

No right to transfer historically wasted waters. —

Where the board finds that excess waters below the divide have historically gone to waste, a petitioner can acquire no right to that excess; and, as a result, petitioner's argument that a denial of the right to transfer such waters is a taking without due process is without merit. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Or abandoned waters. —

If an appropriator, either by misuse or failure to use, has effectively abandoned either all or part of his water right through noncompliance with the beneficial-use requirements imposed by law, he cannot effect a change of use or place of use for that amount of his appropriation which has been abandoned. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Historic-use concept applicable only within confines of adjudicated water right. —

The historic-use concept is applicable only within the confines of an adjudicated water right — there to be considered for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not the historic beneficial use of the right is as great as or less than the amount contemplated by the adjudication by which it was originally authorized. This concept is not intended to permit the enlargement of a water right because the upper limit of a water right is that amount which has been adjudicated. Petition for Change in Use & for Change in Place of Use for Ekxtrom No. 1 Well, etc. v. State Bd. of Control, 649 P.2d 657,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1982).

Junior appropriators have vested rights in continuation of natural stream conditions

existing at the time of their appropriations, thus entitling them to resist changes in points of diversion or use which materially affect their rights. Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Changes in points of discharge of sewage are not governed by same rules

as changes in points of diversion. Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Rights of water importer. —

An importer of water has the right to reuse, successively use and make disposition of imported water, subject to contrary contractual obligations. Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Importer's water use rights not subject to abandonment. —

In the imported water context the importer's unrestricted right to reuse, successively use and make disposition of imported water is usually not subject to abandonment. Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Unrestricted city right to imported waters. —

Where a city has the unrestricted right to reuse, successively use and make disposition of certain imported waters, there is nothing for the state engineer or the board to consider. Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Only board may assert right to adjudicate claim of change of use. State by Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978).

Under this section, the state engineer has no adjudicatory capacity with respect to the question whether a company's proposed action represents a change or expansion of use, and if anyone other than a court has original or primary jurisdiction of that question, it is the board of control. State by Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978).

State engineer's error-correcting
discretion under § 41-4-514(a) must be limited

to the correction
of such errors as are contained in the original permit, as those errors
are established by proof that the permit was not originally, or by
any valid extension, issued in conformity with the intent of the applicant
and/or the state engineer.
Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Board necessary party to action. —

In an action by an oil refiner for declaration that its plan to impound and recycle effluent water, being the water remaining after use in its refinery process of water which it purchased from a city, was not subject to the jurisdiction and control of the state engineer and the board of control, and that the proposed use did not infringe on any rights of downstream water appropriators, the board and the city were necessary and indispensable parties to the action, and the cause should not proceed without their joinder. State by Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978).

Deference to board on factual matters. —

With respect to factual matters, the court has always accorded deference to the board's peculiar knowledge and expertise, as well as the realities and records pertaining to the use or nonuse of water. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Stated

in

In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For comment, “Changing Manner and Place of Use of Water Rights in Wyoming,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1975).

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “Importation Doctrine Applied to Water Transfers Within a River System: A Step Too Far,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 99 (1980).

For comment, “Statutory Recognition of Instream Flow Preservation: A Proposed Solution for Wyoming,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 139 (1982).

For comment, “Sporhase v. Nebraska ex rel. Douglas: State Control of Water Under the Constraints of the Commerce Clause,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1983).

For casenote, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion, and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits: Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For casenote, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act: Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

For article, “Waist Deep in the Big Muddy: Property Rights, Public Values and Instream Waters,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1991).

For case note, “Water Law—Indian Law—Cowboys, Indians and Reserved
Water Rights: May a State Court Limit How Indian Tribes Use Their
Water?
In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 467 (1993).

§ 41-3-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 167, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1974, ch. 23, § 2, related to use of water outside state.

§ 41-3-106.
Procedure to exchange water; delivery of water under exchanges; approval of state engineer; enforcement of exchanges.

Any appropriator owning a valid water right in and to the use of the ground, surface or reservoir waters of the state, where the source of the appropriation is at times insufficient to fully satisfy such appropriation, or better conservation and utilization of the state’s water can be accomplished, or the appropriator can develop appropriable water but cannot economically convey it to its point of use, may petition the state engineer for an order allowing an exchange and the use of stored, direct flow, or ground water from another source. If such an appropriator arranges by agreement with another appropriator for the delivery and use of either stored, direct flow, or ground water from another source, the exchange agreement shall accompany the petition.

Exchanges may be allowed among any combination of direct flow, storage, and groundwater rights. Petitions for exchanges shall be accompanied by such maps, plans or other information as may be required by the state engineer. The proper filing and recording fees shall accompany the petition.

No exchange shall be allowed until the state engineer has entered an order granting the exchange. Documents drawn in connection with exchanges may be recorded in one (1) or more counties where any part of the land involved is situated. No exchange may be terminated without the issuance of an order approving termination, unless the order allowing the exchange provides for termination on a specified date.

It is the policy of the state to encourage exchanges. The state engineer shall not issue an exchange order if it appears that the proposed exchange would adversely affect other appropriators, or if the proposed exchange would, in the opinion of the state engineer, be too difficult to administer or would be adverse to the public interest. All exchanges are subject to the requirements of beneficial use and equality of water exchanged, and no exchange will be allowed unless a sufficient quantity of makeup water is introduced to replace the water diverted and withdrawn under the exchange. In making the determination of equality and sufficiency of the makeup water introduced, the state engineer may consider relative consumptive uses and transmission losses.

Any water made available to an appropriator by reason of any exchange agreement shall be delivered for the use of the appropriator in accordance with the order allowing the exchange, and its use is without prejudice to, but in enjoyment of, the rights of all appropriators under their original appropriations.

Performances of each exchange shall be enforced by the water administration officials of the state in accordance with the terms and conditions of the order allowing the exchange. The state engineer may adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to enable him to efficiently administer this section.

The state engineer shall assess a fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for his review, and approval of exchange petitions. This fee shall accompany an exchange petition and shall be retained and deposited whether the petition or request is approved or denied.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 116, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-5; Laws 1973, ch. 160, § 1; 1979, ch. 56, § 1; 1993, ch. 123, § 1.

Quoted

in

In re Owl Creek Irrigation Dist., 71 Wyo. 30, 253 P.2d 867,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1953).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Underground Water,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 193.

§ 41-3-107.
Submerged lands; petition for change of water rights; conditions; hearing; fees.

The state board of control may, upon the written petition of the owners of an adjudicated water right, or water rights appurtenant to lands submerged by the construction of reservoirs in the state of Wyoming, issue amended certificates of appropriation of water and change the point of diversion and means of conveyance for such adjudicated appropriations of water for the irrigation of other lands in the state of Wyoming outside of the reservoir basin in lieu of the submerged lands, without loss of priority; provided:

The appropriation shall be from the same source of supply;

The irrigated acreage shall include not only new land within the state of Wyoming having no original direct flow water right but also lands within the same drainage area having water rights from another source and which have a need for supplemental water, but in no event shall such right and use so changed exceed in amount of water that of the rights which are being changed;

Such change of water rights be made within five (5) years from the date that construction of the reservoir dam has been completed. If such change is not applied for by the owner or his successors in interest within the five (5) year period such water rights shall become automatically abandoned and the water shall be distributed in order of priority on the stream. Such automatic abandonment shall apply only to lands inundated at and below the high water line of reservoirs. The board of control shall enter an order abandoning the water rights upon a determination that an abandonment has occurred;

The change can be made only on condition that it does not injuriously affect the rights of other Wyoming appropriators.

After receipt of a petition for such change the state board of control shall cause a public hearing to be held on the petition before the superintendent of the water division in which such appropriation is located, with notice of the hearing to be advertised in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper having general circulation in the community where the water right involved is located. The petitioner shall pay the cost of publication prior to the time of hearing and shall provide a stenographic record of the proceedings, which shall be transmitted by the division superintendent to the state board of control with his report. A fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for issuance and recording of each amended certificate of appropriation of water shall be collected by the state board of control at the time of filing of the petition and the board shall also require a deposit of sufficient funds to cover the cost of preparing and recording a certified copy of the order of the board granting the petition.

The owners of lands coming under the provisions of this section may sell or convey lands submerged or to be submerged by any such reservoir with provisions in the deed or other conveyance that the water rights appurtenant thereto may be detached and transferred as provided herein.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 60, § 1; 1953, ch. 190, § 1; 1957, ch. 81, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-9; Laws 1961, ch. 159, § 1; 1979, ch. 56, § 1; 1993, ch. 123, § 1.

Where junior water right would inundate senior water right,

and thus would “impair” the senior right, this section specifically provides a remedy as it permits the sale or transfer of the senior right without interference with its priority. Associated Enters. v. Toltec Watershed Improvement Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978).

No automatic transfer of water rights upon condemnation. —

A landowner's water rights did not automatically transfer to the watershed improvement district upon condemnation of the land for use as a reservoir, and the landowner was therefore permitted to seek a transfer of its water to lands outside the reservoir basin. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist. v. Associated Enters., Inc., ex rel. Johnston, 829 P.2d 819,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For casenote, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act: Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

§ 41-3-108.
Lands taken out of agricultural production or lands taken by eminent domain; retention of priority.

Where lands are taken out of agricultural production as the necessary result of acquisitions for railroad roadbed construction, highway construction, mining or petroleum extraction operations or industrial site acquisitions or lands taken by proceedings in eminent domain or which have become impracticable to irrigate by reason of any of the foregoing conditions, the owner of an affected water right may transfer the water right to other lands held by the owner. The petition for the change in use, or change in place of use shall be properly filed within five (5) years of the date the land went out of production because of any of the conditions specified herein. Failure to file the petition within five (5) years results in forfeiture of the right except as otherwise provided.

The petition for a change in use, or change in place of use, of a water right under this section shall retain its original date of priority.

For a period of five (5) years after the effective date of this act, any appropriator whose land has been out of production for more than five (5) years may petition the board requesting transfer of the water rights involved. The granting or denial of a petition under these circumstances is within the discretion of the board. The decision of the board may be appealed to the district court. The board may hold public hearings in connection with a petition being considered pursuant to this section. All costs in conjunction with the hearing shall be borne by the petitioner.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 189, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-9.1; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), inserted “the owner of an affected water right” following “of the foregoing conditions.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1973, ch. 189, carried no provision as to its effective date, but was enacted at a session that adjourned on February 24, 1973. See §

8-1-108

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 41-3-109.
Construction of W.S. 41-3-107.

The provisions of this act [§§

41-3-107

,

41-3-109

] shall be valid notwithstanding the provisions of W.S.

41-3-101

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 60, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-10.

§ 41-3-110.
Right to acquire temporary water rights for highway or railroad roadbed construction or repair; application; restrictions; fee.

Any person shall have the right to acquire by purchase, gift or lease the right to the use of water which may be embraced in any adjudicated or valid unadjudicated water right, or any portion thereof, for a period of not to exceed two (2) years, for highway construction or repair, railroad roadbed construction or repair, drilling and producing operations, or other temporary purposes, on its own behalf or on behalf of its agents, employees or contractors: provided, that if the proposed use is to be for public highway construction or repair under a contract with the state department of transportation, only the state transportation commission shall have the authority to acquire the water; and the state transportation commission shall have the sole and continuing responsibility for the acquisition, including the payment of all fees, royalties and other consideration for the use of and access to water and the right to acquire the rights to use shall not be delegated to a construction contractor or other third party; and further provided, that any temporary transfer shall be allowed only if no other appropriator is injured thereby.

Before any right to such use shall become operative, an application must be made in writing on a form provided or designated by the state engineer, with a copy of any conveyance or agreement provided, and it shall be filed in the office of the state engineer for his ratification and approval. Upon approval by the state engineer, an order authorizing such use and designating the method, place, and period of use may be entered. No loss, abandonment or impairment of such water rights shall occur or attach as a result of such change or use, except as provided by said conveyance or agreement and order of the state engineer, and upon termination of the temporary diversion and use, as stated in the order, any affected right to the use of water shall automatically be reinvested with all the rights, privileges and uses, and purposes theretofore held and enjoyed.

Only that portion of a water right so acquired which has been consumptively used under the historical use made of the water right, may be diverted by a temporary user. In determining the consumptive use of water rights for the direct use of the natural unstored flow of any stream for irrigation purposes, the return flow from those rights shall be presumed to be fifty percent (50%). In those situations where an assumption of fifty percent (50%) return flow would be significantly in error, the state engineer shall have the prerogative of making a determination of the actual amount of return flow, and the amount of water which can be diverted for the temporary use provided herein shall be adjusted accordingly. The actual historic return flow, or the assumed return flow of fifty percent (50%) will be left in the stream for the use of downstream appropriators. The foregoing formula and procedure for the determination of consumptive use and return flow shall be limited to this section and shall have no application to any other statute of the state of Wyoming. Nothing herein contained shall be treated or construed as changing the prior use of water held by said owner or owners and as provided by the laws of the state of Wyoming.

The state engineer shall assess a fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for his review and approval of temporary water agreements. This fee shall accompany the agreement application and shall be retained and credited to the general fund whether the agreement or request is approved or denied.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 148, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-10.1; Laws 1969, ch. 170, § 1; 1971, ch. 193, § 1; 1979, ch. 56, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 123, § 1; 2005, ch. 15, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), in the first sentence inserted “or designated” and substituted “provided” for “attached.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Challenge of Mine Dewatering to Western Water Law and the New Mexico Response,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 445 (1980).

§ 41-3-111.
Right to acquire temporary water rights for highway or railroad roadbed construction or repair; right of owner who cannot satisfy in full his right during time of diversion.

The owner of any permanent water right, whether prior or subsequent in priority to that temporary right acquired by any person under this act [§§

41-3-110

through

41-3-113

] who cannot satisfy in full his right during the time said temporary user is diverting water under its temporary water right shall have the absolute right upon demand being made upon the appropriate state water commissioner to cause such diversion to be shut off until such time as said owner’s water right is satisfied, or until it is proven that the shutting down of the diversion has no effect upon owner’s right.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 148, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-10.2; Laws 1969, ch. 170, § 2; 1971, ch. 193, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For casenote, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act: Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

§ 41-3-112.
Right to acquire temporary water rights for highway or railroad roadbed construction or repair; wrongfully causing diversion to be shut down.

It shall be unlawful for any person to wrongfully cause a diversion made under a temporary water right required under and by virtue of this act to be shut down. Any violation of this section shall be punishable pursuant to W.S.

41-3-616

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 170, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-10.2:1; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which formerly provided that wrongfully causing a shut down of a diversion was a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed $100 for each day of the shut down.

§ 41-3-113.
Supplemental supply water rights.

A supplemental supply water right is defined as a permit or certificate of appropriation for the diversion, from a stream, of water from a new source of supply for application to lands for which an appropriation of water from a primary source already exists. Such supplemental supply permits or certificates of appropriation may be allowed by the state engineer or the state board of control under such regulations or conditions as he or it may prescribe. The use and administration of presently existing rights for supplemental supply appropriations or rights for supplemental supply appropriations hereafter acquired shall hereafter be made upon the express condition that the total amount of water to be diverted at any one (1) time both under a primary appropriation of water and a supplemental supply appropriation shall not be in excess of one (1) cubic foot of water per second of time for each seventy (70) acre tract so irrigated, except that when the right to divert water under the provisions of W.S.

41-4-317

through

41-4-324

, is permitted the total amount of surplus water to be diverted at any one (1) time both under a primary appropriation of water and a supplemental supply appropriation shall not be in excess of one (1) cubic foot of water per second for each seventy (70) acre tract so irrigated. Nothing herein shall be construed to apply to water stored under a reservoir permit.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 136, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-10.3.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Determining Quantity in Irrigation Appropriations,” see IV Land & Water L. Rev. 501 (1969).

For casenote, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute: Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

§ 41-3-114.
Petition to change point of diversion or means of conveyance.

Any person entitled to the beneficial use of water, whether under a permit issued by the state engineer or a certificate of appropriation issued by the board of control pursuant to W.S.

41-4-511

, who desires to change the point of diversion or means of conveyance, or both, shall file a petition with:

The board of control if the use of the water has been adjudicated under a certificate of appropriation;

The state engineer in all other cases. The state engineer may consider a petition even if water has not been applied to beneficial use however, any change in point of diversion granted by the state engineer shall be in the vicinity of the original diversion, and provided:

The change shall not alter the original project concept; and

The water shall be diverted from the same source of supply described in the original permit.

Petitions for change in point of diversion shall be in affidavit form and shall set forth the name and address of the petitioner, the name of the ditch, pipeline, or other facility, the stream from which water is appropriated, the date of priority and the amount of the appropriation to be changed, permit number, ownership of appropriation, and the location of the present and the proposed new point of diversion by course and distance from a corner of the public land survey. If for irrigation, petitions shall describe the acreage irrigated in each legal subdivision, the reason for the proposed change, and state whether any other appropriator from the same source will be injured in any way, and whether the consent of all owners of intervening diversions has been obtained. The petition shall be accompanied by satisfactory evidence of ownership of the appropriation to be changed.

If the petition is for a change in point of diversion and means of conveyance for all or a part of an appropriation, it shall include, in addition to the foregoing, the name, permit number and date of priority of the ditch or facility to which it is to be changed, and whether the petitioner is the sole owner of both facilities involved or has the consent of the other owners of both ditches or facilities.

Such petitions shall be accompanied by maps in duplicate, one (1) of which shall be on tracing linen of a size required by the state engineer and state board of control, prepared under certificate of a registered land surveyor, and showing accurately the location of the stream, the location of the ditch or ditches involved, location of any intervening diversions, and if for irrigation, the location of the lands changed or affected by such change.

In event that written consents of owners of appropriations which divert between the old and new points of diversion or the owners of ditches or facilities involved in the proposed change are not secured and attached to the petition, the petition shall be referred to:

The superintendent of the water division in which the change is proposed, if the right is adjudicated; or

To the state engineer if the right is unadjudicated.

The state engineer or the superintendent shall set a hearing on the petition and require the petitioner to provide thirty (30) days notice by certified mail with return receipt requested of the time and place of the hearing to any owners of appropriations which divert between the old and new points of diversion and any owners or users of ditches or facilities to be affected by the proposed change. If the state engineer or the state board of control determines that at least twenty (20) owners of appropriations or owners or users of ditches or facilities require notice of the hearing, the state engineer or the state board of control, in lieu of requiring notice by certified mail with return receipt requested, may allow the petitioner to provide notice of the hearing by regular mail and publication. Notice by publication under this subsection shall be accomplished by publishing notice for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the new point of diversion is located. The last date of publication shall occur not less than ten (10) days and not more than thirty (30) days prior to the hearing. The petitioner shall provide the superintendent with a record of the proceedings which shall be transmitted to the state board of control with the superintendent’s report. The state board of control or the state engineer may make such other regulations as may be found necessary. No petition shall be granted if the right of other appropriators will be injuriously affected. The attorney general shall represent the state board of control or the state engineer in any appeal.

A decision by the state engineer granting or denying a petition under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section may be appealed to the board of control. An appeal may be taken to the district court pursuant to W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

from an order of the board of control:

Affirming, modifying or reversing a decision of the state engineer appealed to the board under this subsection; or

Granting, modifying or denying a petition under paragraph (a)(i) of this section.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-10.4; Laws 1985, ch. 99, § 1; 2021 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (f), substituted "require the petitioner to provide" for "give," "certified mail with return receipt requested" for "registered mail" and deleted "the petitioner and" following "the hearing to"; and added the second, third and fourth sentences.

Cross references. —

As to water rights appurtenant to lands to be subdivided, see §

18-5-306

.

Adjudicated water rights of long standing are not readily to be set aside

and will not be set aside unless the proof of just cause is clear, cogent and convincing. White v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 413 P.2d 252,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1966).

Petition to change point of diversion properly granted. —

Wyoming State Board of Control did not err under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 41-3-114(f) in granting applicants'
petition to change the place of use, point of diversion, and means of conveyance for water appropriations because the Board's determinations that the transfer would not result in greater consumptive use or decrease the return flows were supported by relevant evidence.
Garber v. Wagonhound Land & Livestock Co., 2012 WY 89, 279 P.3d 525,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2012).

Prior law. —

Prior to this section a change in point of diversion could be made by an appropriator as a matter of right, provided injury to other appropriators did not result. White v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 413 P.2d 252,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1966).

Cited in

Platt v. Platt, 2014 WY 142,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Nov. 6, 2014).

Applied

in

Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Control, 647 P.2d 1365,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1982); Velasquez v. Chamberlain, 2009 WY 80, 209 P.3d 888,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(June 18, 2009).

Stated

in

Kerbs v. Walck, 2010 WY 53, 229 P.3d 974,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Apr. 27, 2010).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits: Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for diversion of surface water by raising surface level of land, 88 ALR4th 891.